Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5126
Canadian agency and instrumentality obligations.

An insurer may invest in direct obligations of any agency or instrumentality of the government of Canada or obligations for which the full faith and credit of any agency or instrumentality of the government of Canada is pledged for the payment of all principal and interest.

Laws 1991, LB 237, § 26.